Texas, session 892, HB25.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subtitle A, Title 6, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Chapter 446 to read as follows: CHAPTER 446.  IVERMECTIN Sec. 446.001.  SALE OF IVERMECTIN WITHOUT A PRESCRIPTION; ESTABLISHING PROTECTIONS.  (a)  A pharmacist may dispense ivermectin to a person, without requiring a prescription order from a licensed health care practitioner, in accordance with any written standardized procedures or protocols issued by the Texas State Board of Pharmacy, including, if required, providing the person with instructions on the proper use of ivermectin. (b)  Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacist acting in a reasonably prudent manner is not criminally or civilly liable or subject to professional disciplinary action for dispensing ivermectin in accordance with this section. Sec. 446.002.  RULES. The Texas State Board of Pharmacy may adopt the rules necessary to implement this chapter. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. ______________________________ ______________________________ President of the Senate Speaker of the House I certify that H.B. No. 25 was passed by the House on August 27, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 87, Nays 47, 1 present, not voting. ______________________________ Chief Clerk of the House I certify that H.B. No. 25 was passed by the Senate on August 27, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 20, Nays 6. ______________________________ Secretary of the Senate APPROVED:  _____________________ Date _____________________ Governor